Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 8. Appeals.

Collateral references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Unemployment Compensation, §§ 202-222.

81 C.J.S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 271-290.

Declaratory relief. 14 ALR2d 826.

Sec. 23.20.410.
Appeal tribunals.

The department shall appoint one or more referees, each of whom constitutes an appeal tribunal to hear and decide appeals from determinations and redeterminations.

History.

(§ 801 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.415.
Review by appeal tribunal.

A party entitled to notice of determination provided in AS

23.20.340

may file an appeal from the determination to an appeal tribunal within the time specified in that section. However, an appeal from a determination which involves AS

23.20.383

shall be made to the department. The parties to an appeal from a determination shall include all those entitled to notice of the determination and a properly designated representative of the department.

If an appeal involves a question whether service constitutes employment, the tribunal shall give notice of the appeal and the issues involved to a properly designated representative of the department and to the employing unit for which the service was performed. The employing unit, if not already a party, shall then become a party to the appeal.

If an appeal from a determination is pending on the date a redetermination is issued, the appeal unless withdrawn shall be treated as an appeal from the redetermination. Appeals may be withdrawn at the request of the appellant and with the permission of the appeal tribunal if the record preceding the appeal and the request for the withdrawal support the correctness of the determination, and indicate that no coercion or fraud is involved in the withdrawal.

In addition to the issues raised by the determination which is appealed, the tribunal may hear and decide additional issues affecting the claimant’s rights to benefits if, by the date of hearing, the department has issued no final determination concerning the additional issues and the parties involved have been notified of the hearing and of the pendency of the additional issues.

History.

(§ 802 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 65 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.420.
Hearing procedure and record.

Each party shall be promptly given a reasonable opportunity for fair hearing. An appeal tribunal shall inquire into and develop all facts bearing on the issues and shall receive and consider evidence without regard to statutory and common law rules. The appeal tribunal shall include in the record and consider as evidence all records of the department that are material to the issues.

The department shall adopt regulations governing the manner of filing appeals and the conduct of hearings and appeals consistent with the provisions of this chapter. A record shall be kept of all testimony and proceedings in an appeal, but testimony need not be transcribed unless further review is initiated.

Witnesses subpoenaed shall be allowed fees at a rate fixed by the department. The fees of witnesses subpoenaed on behalf of the department or a claimant are considered part of the expense of administering this chapter.

A member of the department, or of an appeal tribunal, or a person acting on behalf of the department may not participate in an appeal in which the person has an interest.

History.

(§ 803 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.425.
Consolidated appeals.

When the same or substantially similar evidence is material to the matter in issue with respect to more than one individual, as long as no party is prejudiced, (1) the same time and place for considering all cases may be fixed; (2) hearings on the cases may be jointly conducted; (3) a single record of the proceedings may be made; and (4) evidence introduced with respect to one proceeding may be considered as introduced in the others.

However, a party who would be prejudiced by a proceeding under (a) of this section may have a separate hearing upon demand.

History.

(§ 804 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.430.
Notice of decision and time for appeal.

After a hearing an appeal tribunal shall promptly make findings and conclusions and on the basis of them shall affirm, modify, or reverse the determination. Each party shall be promptly given a copy of the decision, the supporting findings, and the conclusions. This decision is final unless further review is initiated under AS

23.20.435

within 30 days after the decision is mailed to each party at the party’s last address of record or delivered to the party. The period within which further review may be initiated may be extended for a reasonable period of time upon a showing that the application was delayed as a result of circumstances beyond the party’s control.

History.

(§ 805 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 66 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.435.
Review by department.

An appeal to the department by a party is a matter of right if the decision of the appeal tribunal reverses or modifies the determination of the department, or if a question arising under AS

23.20.383

is presented. In all other cases further appeal to the department is permitted only at the discretion of the department.

The department on its own motion may initiate a review of a decision or determination of an appeal tribunal within 30 days after the date of the decision. The department may affirm, modify, or reverse the findings or conclusions of the appeal tribunal solely on the basis of evidence previously submitted, or upon the basis of additional evidence that it may take or direct to be taken.

History.

(§ 806 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 67 ch 9 SLA 1980; am § 19 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.440.
Removal of appeal to department.

The department may remove to itself or transfer to another appeal tribunal an appeal pending before an appeal tribunal. In an appeal removed to the department, before a fair hearing has been completed, the parties shall be given a fair hearing by the department as required by AS

23.20.410

—

23.20.470

with respect to proceedings before an appeal tribunal.

History.

(§ 808 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.445.
Notice of decision of department and judicial review.

Each party, including the properly designated representative of the department, shall be promptly given a copy of the decision and the supporting findings and conclusions of the department.
The decision is final unless a party initiates judicial review by filing an appeal in the superior court as provided in the Rules of Appellate Procedure of the State of Alaska.
For the purpose of judicial review, an appeal tribunal’s decision from which an application for appeal has been denied by the department is considered the decision of the department, except that the time for initiating judicial review runs from the date of the mailing or delivery of the notice of the denial of the application for appeal by the department.

History.

(§ 809(a) ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 68 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Sec. 23.20.450.
Conclusiveness of final determinations and decisions.

Except to the extent there is a redetermination under AS

23.20.330

—

23.20.405

, all final determinations and decisions are conclusive upon employing units with notice, the department, and the claimant. A final determination or decision as to benefit rights is not subject to collateral attack by an employing unit regardless of notice.

The department, or appeal tribunal, shall reopen a determination or decision or revoke permission for withdrawal of an appeal if (1) it finds that a worker or employer has been defrauded or coerced in connection with the determination, decision, or withdrawal of the appeal, and (2) the defrauded or coerced person informs the appropriate officer or body of the fraud or coercion within 60 days after the person has become aware of the fraud or within 60 days after the coercion has been removed.

History.

(§ 810 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.455.
Rule of decision and certification to department.

Final decisions of the department and the principles of law declared in their support are binding in all subsequent proceedings under this chapter involving similar questions unless expressly or impliedly overruled by a later decision of the department or of a court. Final decisions of appeal tribunals and the principles of law declared in their support are binding on the employees and representatives of the department and are persuasive authority in subsequent appeal tribunal proceedings.

If in a subsequent proceeding the department or an appeal tribunal has serious doubt as to the correctness of a principle previously declared by an appeal tribunal or by the department, or if there is an apparent inconsistency or conflict in final decisions of comparable authority, then the findings of fact in the case may be certified, together with the question of law involved, to the department. After giving notice and reasonable opportunity for hearing upon the law to all parties to the proceedings, the department shall certify to the appropriate employees or representatives of the department or appeal tribunal and the parties its answer to the question submitted; or the department in its discretion may remove to itself the entire proceeding as provided in AS

23.20.440

and give its decision upon the entire case.

History.

(§ 811 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 20 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.460.
Limitation of fees.

A claimant may not be charged fees or costs of any kind by the department, its representative, an appeal tribunal, a court, or a court officer. However, a court may assess costs against the claimant if it determines that the proceedings for judicial review have been instituted without reasonable grounds.

History.

(§ 812 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.465.
Representation of claimant.

A claimant in a proceeding before the department or an appeal tribunal may be represented by counsel or other authorized agent.
The counsel or agent may not charge or receive for services more than an amount approved by the department.

History.

(§ 813 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.470.
Attorney fees.

An attorney at law representing a claimant on appeal to the courts is entitled to reasonable counsel fees as fixed by the court and necessary court costs and printing disbursements as fixed by the court.

The department shall pay the counsel fees, costs, and disbursements out of employment security administration funds in a court appeal (1) from an administrative or judicial decision favorable in whole or in part to the claimant, (2) by a claimant from a department decision which reverses a tribunal decision in the claimant’s favor, (3) as a result of which the claimant is awarded benefits, or (4) by a claimant from a decision by a tribunal, the department, or court which was not unanimous.

History.

(§ 814 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 69 ch 9 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

Workers’ compensation: availability, rate, or method of calculation of interest on attorney’s fees or penalties. 79 ALR5th 201.